Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1301
Act, how cited.

Sections 38-1301 to 38-1315 shall be known and may be cited as the Environmental Health Specialists Practice Act.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 522.